Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4 PROVIDERS - REIMBURSEMENT
25.5-4-402.5. Providers - state university teaching hospitals.

Subject to appropriations by the general assembly, the state department shall make payments to state university teaching hospitals for providing care under the state's medical assistance program established pursuant to this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1185, § 3, effective May 22.

25.5-4-402.7. Unexpended hospital provider fee cash fund - creation - transfer from hospital provider fee cash fund - use of fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1464, § 18, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective November 1, 2018. (See L. 2017, p. 1464.)

25.5-4-402.8. Hospital expenditure report - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Acquired" means the purchase by a hospital, or entity that is owned by or under common ownership and control with the hospital, of all or substantially all of an organization subject to subsection (1)(b)(I) or (1)(b)(II) of this section through an asset, equity, or similar purchase agreement that is a single transaction or series of transactions.

"Affiliated" or "affiliate" means there is a contractual relationship between a hospital or an entity that is owned by or under common ownership and control with the hospital where the contractual relationship enables the hospital or an entity that is owned by or under common ownership and control with the hospital to exercise control over one of the following entities:

Another hospital;

An entity owned by or under common ownership and control with another hospital; or

A physician group practice.

"Control" means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of management and policies of an affiliate, whether through the ownership of equity or membership, by contract or otherwise.

"Major payer group" includes commercial insurers, medicare, medicaid, individuals who self-pay, a financial assistance plan, and the "Colorado Indigent Care Program", established in part 1 of article 3 of this title 25.5.

The state department shall annually prepare a written hospital expenditure report detailing uncompensated hospital costs and the different categories of expenditures, by major payer group, made by hospitals in the state. The state department shall consult with the Colorado healthcare affordability and sustainability enterprise board, created pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (7) and referred to in this section as the "enterprise board", in developing the hospital expenditure report. The state department may share any information it receives from hospitals with the enterprise board. The state department may include information it receives from hospitals in accordance with subsection (2)(b) of this section and that is not otherwise publicly available in the expenditure report and share such information with the enterprise board; except that information the state department receives from hospitals in accordance with subsection (2)(b)(III)(N) of this section is confidential, proprietary, contains trade secrets, and is not a public record pursuant to part 2 of article 72 of title 24. The state department shall not include in the expenditure report, share with the enterprise board, or otherwise publish or distribute information derived from reports pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(III)(N) of this section, although the state department may share this information if such information has been de-identified and aggregated in a manner to prevent identification of the transaction price of any individual acquisition or affiliation. A hospital shall not be in violation of this section if the hospital makes a good faith effort to comply with the reporting requirements of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section, each hospital licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 3 of title 25, or certified pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(II), shall make information available to the state department for purposes of preparing the annual hospital expenditure report. The state board shall establish the format of the information provided by each hospital on an annual basis. The first submission by each hospital must include the information described in subsections (2)(b)(I) and (2)(b)(II) of this section for fiscal years 2011-12 through 2018-19 and the information described in subsection (2)(b)(III) of this section for those fiscal years if such information is available. For each subsequent submission, each hospital shall provide the following information to the state department:

The hospital cost report submitted to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services (CMS) pursuant to 42 CFR 413.20, including a copy of the final forms and worksheets submitted to CMS as part of the hospital cost report;

An annual audited financial statement prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Each hospital shall submit the statement within one hundred twenty days after the end of its fiscal year unless the state department grants an extension in writing in advance of that date.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2)(b)(II)(A) of this section, if a hospital is operating within a health system or other corporate structure and is normally included in that health system or other corporate structure's financial statement, the hospital may submit the health system or other corporate structure's financial statement if the statement separately identifies the financial information for each of the health system or other corporate structure's licensed hospitals operating in this state.

In lieu of an audited financial statement, each hospital operating within a health system or other corporate structure that does not produce an annual audited financial statement specific to each individual hospital, but instead produces consolidated financial statements, shall submit a reconciliation of the consolidated financial statement and hospital-specific revenue and expenses reported on the medicare cost report pursuant to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services provider reimbursement manual form 339.

A report that contains the following information:

The total number of available beds and licensed beds;

Inpatient statistics in total and by major payer group and by care setting, including but not limited to inpatient discharges and patient days;

Other inpatient statistics, including but not limited to the number of inpatient surgeries, number of births, number of newborn patient days, number of admissions from the hospital-based emergency department, and number of admissions from free-standing emergency departments;

Outpatient statistics in total and by type of visit, including but not limited to hospital-based emergency department visits, free-standing emergency department visits, ambulatory surgery visits, home health visits, and all other outpatient visits;

Gross charges in total, by major payer group, and by care setting, including but not limited to inpatient care and outpatient care;

Contractual allowances in total and by major payer group;

Bad debt write-offs in total and by major payer group;

Charity write-offs in total and by major payer group;

Operating expenses in total and by expense classification, including but not limited to nonphysician payroll expenses and associated hours, physician payroll expenses and associated hours, total payroll expenses and associated hours, contract labor expenses and associated hours, employee benefits expenses, business development, marketing and advertising expenses, supply expenses, depreciation expenses, interest expenses, and all other operating expenses;

Other operating revenue, operating margin, nonoperating gains and losses, and total margin;

A balance sheet, including but not limited to details for current assets, restricted assets, long-term assets, other assets, current liabilities, long-term debt, other liabilities, and equity or net assets;

Staffing information, including but not limited to full-time equivalents, staff turnover, and staff vacancy rates;

A roll forward of property, plant, and equipment accounts by asset type from the beginning to the end of the reporting period by asset category, including but not limited to purchases, other acquisitions, sales, disposals, and other changes; and

The names and transaction price of acquired hospitals, affiliated hospitals, newly constructed hospitals, and rehabilitated hospitals; the names and transaction price of acquired or affiliated physician group practices; and the number and transaction price of individual physician practices acquired.

The state department may exempt from the reporting requirements described in subsection (2)(b) of this section certain types of hospitals, including but not limited to:

Psychiatric hospitals, as licensed by the department of public health and environment;

Hospitals that are licensed as general hospitals and certified as long-term care hospitals by the department of public health and environment;

Critical access hospitals that are licensed as general hospitals and are certified by the department of public health and environment pursuant to 42 CFR 485 subpart F;

Inpatient rehabilitation facilities; and

Hospitals specified for exemption under 42 CFR 433.68 (e).

Prior to developing the first annual hospital expenditure report, the state department shall consult with the enterprise board regarding the development of the report. The state department shall strive for consistency in reporting the components in each annual report with those in the report of the enterprise board required pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4 (7)(e).

Prior to issuing the hospital expenditure report, the state department shall provide any hospital referenced in the hospital expenditure report a copy of the report. Each hospital shall have a minimum of fifteen days to review the hospital expenditure report and any underlying data and submit corrections or clarifications to the state department.

The state department shall provide a statewide hospital association any information received pursuant to this section in a machine-readable format at no cost to the association.

The hospital expenditure report must include, but not be limited to:

A description of the methods of analysis and definitions of report components;

Uncompensated care costs by major payer group; and

The percentage that each of the following categories contributes to overall expenses of hospitals:

Delivery of inpatient health care and services by major payer group;

Delivery of outpatient health care and services by major payer group and site location;

Administrative costs;

Capital construction costs and associated bond liabilities;

Maintenance;

Capital expenditures;

Personnel services;

Uncompensated care by major payer group; and

Other expenditure categories, as determined by the state department.

On or before January 15, 2020, and on or before January 15 each year thereafter, the state department shall submit the annual hospital expenditure report to:

(I) The public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee;

(II) The health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committee;

(III) The joint budget committee of the general assembly;

(IV) The governor; and

(V) The state board.

The state department may request that the enterprise board combine the hospital expenditure report described in this section with the report of the enterprise board specified in section 25.5-4-402.4 (7)(e), so long as the specific requirements of this section are fulfilled, and so long as the enterprise board agrees to the request. The state department shall post the annual report on its website by January 15 of each year.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the report required in this section continues indefinitely.

The state department, in consultation with the department of public health and environment and the division of insurance, shall review the hospital report card, created pursuant to section 25-3-703, and the hospital charge report, created pursuant to section 25-3-705, and make recommendations to the general assembly by November 1, 2019. The recommendations must identify any structural or substantive changes that should be made to the hospital report card or hospital charge report to increase the value of those reports, including a consideration of whether the hospital report card or hospital charge report still provides value to consumers and policymakers.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1001), ch. 52, p. 177, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(c)(III) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2802, § 21, effective July 2.

25.5-4-403. Providers - behavioral health safety net providers - reimbursement.

For the purpose of reimbursing essential behavioral health safety net and comprehensive community behavioral health providers, as defined in section 27-50-101, except for those that are also federally qualified health centers, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x(aa)(4), which have payment methodology pursuant to section 25.5-5-408, the state department shall establish an appropriate cost accounting methodology annually with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services in order to support sustainable access to behavioral health safety net services, as defined in section 27-50-101. In establishing the payment methodology, the state department shall consider:

Actual costs of services, including services to address language and cultural barriers necessary to serve communities of color and other underserved populations;

Costs that are reasonable, as determined by the state department in collaboration with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services;

Quality and accessibility of behavioral health safety net care provided, as determined by the state department, in collaboration with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, by rule;

Health equity;

Access by priority populations as determined by the behavioral health administration in the department of human services; and

Value-based payment approaches that incentivize providers to expand access to cost-effective behavioral health services to serve the behavioral health safety net.

The standards and processes for determining the payment methodology will be determined by an auditing and accounting committee. The members of the committee are selected by the state department to include behavioral health administrative service organizations, managed care entities, behavioral health safety net providers as defined in section 27-50-101, independent auditors, actuaries, consumer and family advocates, local government representatives, other state agencies, and other relevant stakeholders.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1844, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1512, § 68, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-409 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-403.1. Providers - community mental health centers - cost reporting.

For the purposes of increased payment methodology transparency, no later than March 15, 2023, and each March 15 thereafter, the state department shall:

Publish cost reports for community mental health centers;

Establish a cost-reporting template and cost-reporting schedule to assist providers in providing cost reports;

Redact information to maintain compliance with state and federal law including, but not limited to, personally identifying information and protected health information as necessary to protect the privacy of patients;

Create a publicly available website that provides insight to medicaid members, medicaid providers, and members of the public regarding behavioral health reimbursement rates. The website must include the following:

All completed cost reports for each behavioral health safety net provider, as defined in section 27-50-101 (7);

An overview of the purpose of the cost report described in this subsection (1);

Information on how to interpret the cost reports and where to find information in the cost reports;

An overview of:

How reimbursement rates are determined;

What constitutes a reasonable and allowable cost; and

How value-based payments impact reimbursement rates; and

The state department's plan to improve behavioral health reimbursement rates and annual updates to the plan.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1268), ch. 363, p. 2598, § 3, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1268, see section 1 of chapter 363, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-4-404. Payments for clinic services - restrictions on use.

All payments received by county or district public health agencies or boards of health for clinic services, as defined in section 25.5-5-301 (3), furnished to patients shall be used only to offset costs incurred for provision of services by such county or district public health agencies or boards of health or to cash fund health-care services in the county where the services were provided.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1844, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2110, § 142, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-515 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-405. Mental health managed care service providers - requirements.

Each contract between the state department and a managed care organization providing mental health services to a recipient under the medical assistance program shall comply with all federal requirements, including but not limited to:

Ensuring that a recipient with complex or multiple needs who requires mental health services shall have access to mental health professionals with appropriate training and credentials and shall provide the recipient with such services in collaboration with the recipient's other providers;

Informing each recipient of his or her right to and the process for appeal upon notification of denial, termination, or reduction of a requested service; and

Administering initial stabilization treatment for a recipient and transferring the recipient for appropriate continued services.

(1.5) Each contract between the state department and a managed care organization providing mental health services to a recipient under the medical assistance program shall allow for the use of telemedicine pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-5-320.

For mental health managed care recipients, the state department shall have a patient representative program for recipient grievances that complies with all federal requirements and that shall:

Be posted in a conspicuous place at each location at which mental health services are provided;

Allow for a patient representative to serve as a liaison between the recipient and the provider;

Describe the qualifications for a patient representative;

Outline the responsibilities of a patient representative;

Describe the authority of a patient representative; and

Establish a method by which each recipient is informed of the patient representative program and how a patient representative may be contacted.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1844, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1.5) added, p. 111, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-409.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-406. Rate setting - medicaid residential treatment service providers - monitoring and auditing - report.

The state department shall approve a rate-setting process consistent with medicaid requirements for providers of medicaid residential treatment services in the state of Colorado as developed by the department of human services. The rate-setting process developed pursuant to this section may include, but shall not be limited to:

A range for reimbursement that represents a base-treatment rate for serving a child who is subject to out-of-home placement due to dependency and neglect, a child placed in a residential child care facility pursuant to the "Children and Youth Mental Health Treatment Act", article 67 of title 27, or a child who has been adjudicated a delinquent, which includes a defined service package to meet the needs of the child;

A request for proposal to contract for specialized service needs of a child, including but not limited to: Substance-abuse treatment services; sex offender services; and services for the developmentally disabled; and

Negotiated incentives for achieving outcomes for the child as defined by the state department, counties, and providers.

The medicaid rate-setting process approved by the state department shall include a two- or three-year implementation timeline with implementation beginning in state fiscal year 2008-09.

The state department and the department of human services, in consultation with the representatives of the counties and the provider community, shall review the rate-setting process every two years and shall submit any changes to the joint budget committee of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1845, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, p. 618, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 800, § 66, effective April 29.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 18-1094), ch. 343, p. 2044, § 10, effective June 30.

25.5-4-407. Services by licensed psychologists without a doctor's referral.

The executive director of the state department may authorize the providing of services of licensed psychologists without the requirement that the services be referred by a doctor of medicine or a doctor of osteopathy, but such services shall be subject to the cost containment program specified under section 25.5-4-408. The executive director may except from the authorization those services the director determines to be necessary for the purpose of promoting the primary care physician program.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1846, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-412 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-408. Services provided by licensed psychologists - cost containment program.

Working in conjunction with licensed psychologists in the state, the state board shall promulgate rules to establish and implement mechanisms for containing the costs of services provided by licensed psychologists under the medical assistance programs established pursuant to this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title. The cost containment mechanism shall ensure that the costs to the medical assistance program will result in no increase in the total cost of the program solely as a result of the reimbursement for services of licensed psychologists pursuant to section 25.5-4-407. The cost containment mechanisms may include the following:

Limiting the number of days a licensed psychologist may be reimbursed per patient for inpatient hospitalization, partial hospitalization, and outpatient visits without an order for continued treatment from a doctor of medicine or osteopathy;

Limiting the number of hours a licensed psychologist may be reimbursed for diagnostic testing and evaluation per patient per year;

Provision of group therapy when needed or appropriate;

Provision of licensed psychologists' services from a pool of those licensed psychologists requesting to be included in such pool;

Provision of a licensed psychologist's services through the use of telemedicine pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-5-320.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1846, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(e) added, p. 111, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-516 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-409. Authorization of services - nurse anesthetists - advanced practice registered nurses.

When services by a certified registered nurse anesthetist are provided pursuant to an order by a physician in accordance with this article 4, articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, and section 12-255-104 (10), the executive director of the state department shall authorize reimbursement for said services. Payment for such services shall be made directly to the nurse anesthetist, if requested by the nurse anesthetist; except that this section shall not apply to nurse anesthetists when acting within the scope of their employment as salaried employees of public or private institutions or physicians.

When services by an advanced practice registered nurse registered pursuant to section 12-255-111 are provided in accordance with this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, the executive director of the state department shall authorize reimbursement for said services. Payment for the services shall be made directly to the advanced practice registered nurse, if requested by the advanced practice registered nurse; except that this section shall not apply to advanced practice registered nurses when acting within the scope of their employment as salaried employees of public or private institutions or physicians.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1846, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 138, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1707, § 178, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-413 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-410. Services of audiologists and speech pathologists without supervision.

When medical or diagnostic services by an audiologist or speech pathologist are provided pursuant to an order by a physician in accordance with this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title, the executive director of the state department shall authorize reimbursement for said services. For the purposes of this section, "audiologist" or "speech pathologist" means an individual who meets the requirements set forth in the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, or any federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto, for participating providers of audiology or speech pathology services.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as expanding the provision of services available as a part of the medical assistance program established pursuant to this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title. For the purposes of making payments to audiologists or speech pathologists pursuant to this section, the state board shall establish rules implementing this section. The rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection (2) shall ensure that the costs to the medical assistance program will result in no increase in the total cost of the program solely as a result of the reimbursement for services of an audiologist or speech pathologist pursuant to this section.

Payments for services included in this section shall be made directly to the audiologist or speech pathologist, if requested by the audiologist or speech pathologist; except that this section shall not apply to audiologists or speech pathologists when acting within the scope of their employment as salaried employees of public or private institutions or physicians.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1847, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-414 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-411. Authorization of services provided by dental hygienists.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2023.] When dental hygiene services are provided to children by a licensed dental hygienist who is providing dental hygiene services pursuant to section 12-220-503 without the supervision of a licensed dentist, the executive director of the state department shall authorize reimbursement for said services, subject to the requirements of this section. Payment for the services shall be made directly to the licensed dental hygienist, if requested by the licensed dental hygienist; except that this section shall not apply to licensed dental hygienists when acting within the scope of their employment as salaried employees of public or private institutions, physicians, or dentists.

For each child provided dental hygiene services pursuant to this section, the dental hygienist shall attempt to identify a dentist participating in medicaid for the child.

25.5-4-411. Authorization of services provided by dental hygienists.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2023.] When dental hygiene services are provided to children by a licensed dental hygienist or dental therapist who is providing dental hygiene services pursuant to section 12-220-503 without the supervision of a licensed dentist, the executive director of the state department shall authorize reimbursement for said services, subject to the requirements of this section. Payment for the services shall be made directly to the licensed dental hygienist or dental therapist, if requested by the licensed dental hygienist or dental therapist; except that this section does not apply to licensed dental hygienists or dental therapists when acting within the scope of their employment as salaried employees of public or private institutions, physicians, or dentists.

For each child provided dental hygiene services pursuant to this section, the dental hygienist or dental therapist shall attempt to identify a dentist participating in medicaid for the child.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1847, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1707, § 179, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (HB 20-1056), ch. 64, p. 263, § 9, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-219), ch. 381, p. 2727, § 39, effective January 1, 2023.

25.5-4-412. Family planning services - family-planning-related services - rules - definitions.

When family planning services or family-planning-related services are provided in accordance with this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, the executive director of the state department shall authorize reimbursement for the services, subject to section 50 of article V of the state constitution. The state department, any intermediary, or any managed care organization shall reimburse the provider of those services. Family planning services and family-planning-related services are not subject to policy deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Family-planning-related services" means services provided in a family planning setting as part of or as a follow-up to a family planning visit, including:

Medically necessary evaluations or preventive services, such as tobacco utilization screening, counseling, testing, and cessation services;

Cervical cancer screening and prevention;

Diagnosis or treatment of a sexually transmitted infection or sexually transmitted disease, and medication and supplies to prevent a sexually transmitted infection or sexually transmitted disease; and

Any other medical diagnosis, treatment, or preventive service that is routinely provided pursuant to a family planning visit.

"Family planning services" means all services covered by the federal Title X family planning program, regardless of an individual's age, sex, or gender identity, or the age, sex, or gender identity of the individual's partner, including but not limited to:

All contraception, as defined in section 2-4-401 (1.5);

Health-care and counseling services focused on preventing, delaying, or planning for a pregnancy;

Follow-up visits to evaluate or manage problems associated with contraceptive methods;

Sterilization services, regardless of an individual's sex; and

Basic fertility services.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

For purposes of making payments to providers, the state board shall establish rules implementing this section.

Any recipient may obtain family planning services or family-planning-related services from any licensed health-care provider, including but not limited to a doctor of medicine, doctor of osteopathy, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse, who provides such services. The enrollment of a recipient in a managed care organization, or a similar entity, does not restrict a recipient's choice of the licensed provider from whom the recipient may receive those services.

The state board shall promulgate rules establishing the specific family-planning-related services and family planning services identified in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section. Prior to promulgating the rules, the state department shall engage in a stakeholder process that attempts to include individuals who have received family planning services through the state's medical assistance program or the children's basic health plan, representatives of consumer advocacy organizations, and family planning providers. The stakeholders must be diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, age, ability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or geographic region of the state.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1848, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-158), ch. 204, p. 729, § 21, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-016), ch. 428, p. 2835, § 3, effective July 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-414.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 16-158, see section 1 of chapter 204, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

25.5-4-413. Certain providers to inform patients of rights concerning advance medical directives.

On and after November 5, 1991, with regard to any service rendered on and after said date, each hospital, nursing care facility, home health agency, hospice program, and health maintenance organization participating in the state medical assistance program or providing medical assistance pursuant to parts 3 to 12 of article 6 of this title shall provide written information to all adult patients of such providers concerning patients' rights under state law to make medical treatment decisions, including the right to accept or refuse any medical or surgical treatment and the right to formulate advance directives regarding said decisions. As used in this section, "advance directives" includes any written or oral instructions recognized under state law concerning the making of medical treatment decisions on behalf of or the provision of medical care for the person who provided the instructions in the event such person becomes incapacitated. Advance directives include, but are not limited to, medical durable powers of attorney, durable powers of attorney, or living wills.

Providers listed in subsection (1) of this section shall provide educational programs for staff and the community concerning advance directives and shall maintain written policies detailing methods for safeguarding patients' rights concerning medical treatment decisions, including documenting in the patient's medical or patient record whether the patient has executed, amended, or revoked an advance directive. No provider shall condition the provision of services or otherwise discriminate against a patient on the basis of whether the patient has executed an advance directive.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1848, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-403.5 as it existed prior to 2006.